District of Columbia statutes.
7-1708

Exceptions.

This subchapter shall not prohibit smoking in the following areas:

(1)

An area where smoking is permitted by any provision of this subchapter;

(2)

A tobacco shop or store primarily concerned with selling tobacco and smoking equipment;

(3)

Upon the stage by performers during the course of any theatrical performance if smoking is part of the theatrical production;

(4)

A tavern or nightclub as defined in § 25-101(52) and (33), respectively; or

(5)

A room or hall that is used for private social functions, which includes weddings, banquets, and parties.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 10
as added Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-100, § 2(h), 35 DCR 1182
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 34, 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 6-918.
D.C. Law 16-191, in par. (4), substituted “§ 25-101(52) and (33)” for “§ 25-103(17) and (23)”.
Section 25-103, referred to in paragraph (4) of this section, is part of Title 25, D.C. Code, which title was amended and enacted by D.C. Law 13-298, effective May 3, 2001. For disposition of the subject matter of former Title 25, see the Disposition Table preceding § 25-101.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.